Nevada, session 83, SB412.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.5. NRS 363A.120 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
363A.120 1. There is hereby imposed an excise tax on each
bank at the rate of $1,750 for each branch office maintained by the
bank in this State in excess of one branch office maintained by
the bank in each county in this State on [the first day of each
calendar quarter.] July 1 of each year.
-
*SB412_R1*

– 2 –
2. Each bank that maintains more than one branch office in any
county in this State on [the first day of a calendar quarter] July 1,
shall, on or before [the last day of the first month of that calendar
quarter:] July 31:
(a) File with the Department a return on a form prescribed by
the Department; and
(b) Remit to the Department any tax due pursuant to this section
for the branch offices maintained by the bank in this State on [the
first day of that calendar quarter.] July 1.
3. For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Bank” means:
(1) A corporation or limited-liability company that is
chartered by this State, another state or the United States which
conducts banking or banking and trust business; or
(2) A foreign bank licensed pursuant to chapter 666A of
NRS.
 The term does not include a financial institution engaging in
business pursuant to chapter 677 of NRS, a credit union organized
under the provisions of chapter 672 of NRS or the Federal Credit
Union Act, or any person or other entity this State is prohibited from
taxing under the Constitution, laws or treaties of the United States or
the Nevada Constitution.
(b) “Branch office” means any location or facility of a bank
where deposit accounts are opened, deposits are accepted, checks
are paid and loans are granted, including, but not limited to, a brick
and mortar location, a detached or attached drive-in facility, a
seasonal office, an office on a military base or government
installation, a station or unit for paying and receiving, and a location
where a customer can open accounts, make deposits and borrow
money by telephone or through use of the Internet, and excluding
any automated teller machines, consumer credit offices, contractual
offices, customer bank communication terminals, electronic fund
transfer units and loan production offices.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2027.
H
-
*SB412_R1*